Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-395
Streets; establish or change grade; authority of city.

The city may authorize any street, boulevard, highway, main thoroughfare, controlled-access facility, connecting link, major traffic street, alley, or part thereof graded to a grade as established or changed in accordance with section 14-393.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 12, p. 200.